Massachusetts, session 194th, H2067.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 25 of Chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following paragraph:- An individual 
who works as an on call town fire fighter does not need to submit that stipend as income for 
unemployment compensation. A on call fire fighter with stipends shall be considered eligible for 
unemployment compensation.